Vermont, session 2025-2026, H9.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 266 is added to read:
§ 266. VERMONT STATE AND JUDICIARY EMPLOYEES’
COST-SAVINGS INCENTIVE PROGRAM
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “State employee” means any classified, nonmanagement State
employee in the Executive Branch or Judicial Branch.
(2) “Suggestion” means a proposal by a State employee that has been
submitted to the branch in which the employee is employed that may result in
financial savings for that branch.
VT LEG #378849 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.9
2025 Page 2 of 7
(b) There is established the Vermont State and Judiciary Employees’
Cost-Savings Incentive Program. The Program shall provide financial
incentives to State employees who make suggestions that are adopted and
result in financial savings for any Executive agency, department, board,
bureau, commission, or other administrative unit of the State or for the
Judiciary.
(c) To be eligible for an award under this Program, a State employee or
group of employees shall submit a suggestion to reduce expenditures on a form
created by the Department of Human Resources designated for this purpose.
An employee who is otherwise eligible for an award under this section shall
not receive the award until the employee has satisfied any and all State tax
obligations.
(d) Within 60 days following the receipt of a suggestion, the agency,
department, board, bureau, commission, or other administrative unit of the
State or the Judiciary that receives a suggestion shall determine whether:
(1) the suggestion is feasible and desirable;
(2) the suggestion is an idea that is not already under active study or has
not been under continual review by the State;
(3) the suggestion is beyond the reasonable expectations of job
performance, as informed by the employee’s job specifications; and
VT LEG #378849 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.9
2025 Page 3 of 7
(4) implementation of the suggestion will not negatively impact the
quality of services presently provided by the State.
(e) An employee shall be entitled to an award only if the employee’s
suggestion meets each of the criteria set forth in subsection (d) of this section
and the suggestion is implemented.
(f) Any Executive agency, department, board, bureau, commission, or other
administrative unit of the State or the Judiciary that receives a suggestion, shall
present its assessment of the criteria set forth in subsection (d) of this section
on the form designated for this purpose and shall state whether it intends to
implement the suggestion. A copy of this form shall be sent to the employee
or employees making the suggestion, the Department of Human Resources,
and the Department of Finance and Management if the employee making the
suggestion is an Executive Branch employee, and to the Court Administrator if
the employee making the suggestion is a Judiciary employee.
(g) If each of the criteria set forth in subsections (d) and (e) of this section
is met, the Executive agency, department, board, bureau, commission, or other
administrative unit of the State or the Judiciary shall implement the suggestion.
The employee or group of employees making the suggestion shall then be
entitled to a total monetary award equal to 25 percent of the savings realized as
a direct result of the suggestion in the first year of its implementation, but the
maximum total monetary award shall not exceed $25,000.00 under any
VT LEG #378849 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.9
2025 Page 4 of 7
circumstances. If the suggestion is simultaneously made by more than one
employee, the award shall be divided equally among the employees who
submitted the suggestion. The sum awarded shall be reportable as wages and
subject to applicable State and federal taxes, as appropriate. The award shall
be computed on the actual savings for a 12-month period, with the period to
run from the time that the suggestion is fully implemented. An award made
pursuant to this section shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the agency,
department, board, bureau, commission, or other administrative unit of the
State or the Judiciary that realizes the cost savings and shall be paid to the
employee within one year and 30 days following full implementation of the
suggestion. An award shall not be included when calculating an employee’s
average final compensation for determining the employee’s retirement
allowance.
(h) If an employee who is eligible for an award under this section
terminates State service prior to full implementation of the employee’s
suggestion, the employee shall be entitled to receive the full award.
(i)(1) If the agency, department, board, bureau, commission, or other
administrative unit of the State or the Judiciary that receives a suggestion
rejects the suggestion, the employee may file a written request to review the
suggestion with a copy of the form and the assessment to the appropriate
review panel. The review panel shall then recommend to the State Auditor or
VT LEG #378849 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.9
2025 Page 5 of 7
the Court Administrator, as appropriate, whether to affirm or overrule the
decision of the Executive agency, department, board, bureau, commission, or
other administrative unit of the State or the Judiciary and the State Auditor’s or
Court Administrator’s decision shall be final.
(2) If a suggestion is made by an employee of an Executive agency,
department, board, bureau, commission, or other administrative unit of the
State, the appropriate review panel shall consist of two members of the
Vermont State Employees’ Association, Inc. appointed by the Association’s
Executive Director, two members from the Agency of Administration
appointed by the Secretary of Administration, and one member appointed by
the State Auditor.
(3) If a suggestion is made by an employee of the Judiciary, the
appropriate review panel shall consist of two members of the Vermont State
Employees’ Association, Inc., appointed by the Association’s Executive
Director, and three members from the Judiciary, appointed by the Court
Administrator.
(4) The appropriate review panel shall meet within 30 days after
receiving a written request and shall make a recommendation to the State
Auditor or Court Administrator, as appropriate, within 15 days following the
meeting.
VT LEG #378849 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.9
2025 Page 6 of 7
(j) If an employee believes that the Executive agency, department, board,
bureau, commission, or other administrative unit of the State or the Judiciary
has erroneously calculated or underestimated the savings realized by the
suggestion, the employee may submit a written request to the State Auditor or
the Court Administrator, as appropriate, that explains the employee’s objection
to the amount awarded in writing within 30 days following the award. The
State Auditor or the Court Administrator shall review the amount awarded and
may increase the amount of an award or affirm the award. The decision of the
State Auditor or the Court Administrator shall be final.
(k) In the event an employee’s suggestion is denied on the basis of the
criteria set forth in subdivision (d)(1) or (4) of this section, and is subsequently
implemented within three years following the date the employee made the
suggestion, the employee shall receive a monetary award in accordance with
subsection (g) of this section.
(l) The State Auditor and the Court Administrator shall file a report with
the Governor and the General Assembly for each fiscal year, beginning on
January 1, 2027, summarizing the suggestions implemented and the savings
realized. The State Auditor and the Court Administrator shall also identify the
suggestions that were rejected and the rationale for these rejections. A copy of
this report shall be provided to the Executive Director of the Vermont State
Employees’ Association, Inc.
VT LEG #378849 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.9
2025 Page 7 of 7
(m) The Joint Fiscal Committee shall review the State Auditor’s and the
Court Administrator’s reports on the Program with the Executive Director of
the Vermont State Employees’ Association, Inc., or the Executive Director’s
designee, at least once during each fiscal year.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378849 v.2